Maryland, session 2025, HB0586.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
10–205.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Compensation” includes stipends for transportation, training, and
bonus payments.
(3) “Returning election judge” means an election judge who has served a
term of office for the immediately preceding statewide election.
(b) (1) (i) The county governing body shall provide sufficient funding to
meet the minimum compensation levels required under this section.
(ii) Within the limits authorized by the county governing body, a
local board may fix the compensation of election judges above the minimum compensation
levels required under this section.
(2) A local board shall pay an election judge for:
(i) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (4)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, each
course of instruction required under § 10–206(g)(1) of this subtitle that the election judge
completes; and
(ii) each election day and each early voting day that the election
judge actually serves.
(3) (i) For each election judge who is not a returning election judge, the
compensation for each election day and each early voting day actually served shall be at
least $250 per day.
(ii) For each returning election judge, the compensation for each
election day and each early voting day actually served shall be at least $100 more per day
than the compensation provided to an election judge who is not a returning election judge.
(4) (I) The compensation for each completed course of instruction
required under § 10–206(g)(1) of this subtitle shall be at least $50.
(II) A LOCAL BOARD SHALL PAY AN ELECTION JUDGE THE
COMPENSATION REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION ONLY
AFTER THE ELECTION JUDGE ACTUALLY SERVES AN ELECTION DAY OR EARLY
VOTING DAY.

HOUSE BILL 586 3
(c) The State Board shall reimburse each local board for $50 of the additional
compensation required under subsection (b)(3)(ii) of this section that is paid to each
returning election judge.
(D) FOR SERVICE AS AN ELECTION JUDGE, A PUBLIC SCHOOL STUDENT IN
THE STATE MAY BOTH:
(1) EARN HOURS TOWARD THE SERVICE–LEARNING REQUIREMENT
FOR GRADUATION UNDER COMAR 13A.03.02.05; AND OR
(2) RECEIVE THE ELECTION JUDGE COMPENSATION UNDER THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.